Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 6. Foreign Cooperatives.

Sec. 10.15.525.
Rights, exemptions, and privileges of foreign cooperatives.

A foreign cooperative which has a member residing in the state, and which distributes its proceeds and savings according to this chapter or the law of the state where it is incorporated, is entitled to all rights, exemptions, and privileges of a cooperative organized under this chapter, if it is authorized to do business in the state as provided in AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code).

History.

(§ 60 ch 107 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 “AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code)” was substituted for “Alaska Business Corporations Act (AS 10.05)” to conform to the enactment of AS 10.06 and the repeal of AS 10.05 by ch. 166, SLA 1988.